Florida, session 2026, SB982.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 21 22 Section 1.âSection 320.06, Florida Statutes, is amended to 23 read: 24 320.06âRegistration certificates and, license plates;, and 25 validation stickers generally.â 26 (1)(a)âUpon the receipt of an initial application for 27 registration and payment of the appropriate license tax and 28 other fees required by law, the department shall assign to the 29 motor vehicle a registration license number consisting of 30 letters and numerals or numerals and issue to the owner or 31 lessee a certificate of registration and one registration 32 license plate, unless two plates are required for display by s. 33 320.0706, for each vehicle so registered. 34 (b)1.âRegistration license plates bearing a graphic symbol 35 and the alphanumeric system of identification shall be issued 36 for a 10-year period. At the end of the 10-year period, upon 37 renewal, the plate shall be replaced. The department shall 38 extend the scheduled license plate replacement date from a 6 39 year period to a 10-year period. The fee for such replacement is 40 $28, $2.80 of which shall be paid each year before the plate is 41 replaced, to be credited toward the next $28 replacement fee. 42 The fees shall be deposited into the Highway Safety Operating 43 Trust Fund. A credit or refund may not be given for any prior 44 yearsâ payments of the prorated replacement fee if the plate is 45 replaced or surrendered before the end of the 10-year period, 46 except that a credit may be given if a registrant is required by 47 the department to replace a license plate under s. 48 320.08056(8)(a). With each license plate, a validation sticker 49 shall be issued showing the ownerâs birth month, license plate 50 number, and the year of expiration or the appropriate renewal 51 period if the owner is not a natural person. The validation 52 sticker shall be placed on the upper right corner of the license 53 plate. The license plate and validation sticker shall be issued 54 based on the applicantâs appropriate renewal period. The 55 registration period is 12 months, the extended registration 56 period is 24 months, and all expirations occur based on the 57 applicantâs appropriate registration period. Rental vehicles 58 taxed pursuant to s. 320.08(6)(a) and rental trucks taxed 59 pursuant to s. 320.08(3)(a)-(c) and (4)(a)-(d) may elect a 60 permanent registration period, provided payment of the 61 appropriate license taxes and fees occurs annually. 62 2.âBeginning July 1, 2024, A vehicle registered in 63 accordance with the International Registration Plan must be 64 issued a license plate for a 3-year period. At the end of the 3 65 year period, upon renewal, the license plate must be replaced. 66 Each license plate must include a validation sticker showing the 67 month of expiration. A cab card denoting the declared gross 68 vehicle weight for each apportioned jurisdiction must be issued 69 annually. The fee for an original or a renewal cab card is $28, 70 which must be deposited into the Highway Safety Operating Trust 71 Fund. If the license plate is damaged or worn, it may be 72 replaced at no charge by applying to the department and 73 surrendering the current license plate. 74 3.âIn order to retain the efficient administration of the 75 taxes and fees imposed by this chapter, the 80-cent fee increase 76 in the replacement fee imposed by chapter 2009-71, Laws of 77 Florida, is negated as provided in s. 320.0804. 78 (c)âRegistration license plates equipped with validation 79 stickers subject to the registration period are valid for not 80 more than 12 months and expire at midnight on the last day of 81 the registration period. A registration license plate equipped 82 with a validation sticker subject to the extended registration 83 period is valid for not more than 24 months and expires at 84 midnight on the last day of the extended registration period. A 85 registration license plate equipped with a validation sticker 86 subject to a permanent registration period is permanently valid 87 but shall become void if appropriate license taxes and fees are 88 not paid annually. For each registration period after the one in 89 which the metal registration license plate is issued, and until 90 the license plate is required to be replaced, the renewal shall 91 be recorded electronically a validation sticker showing the 92 month and year of expiration shall be issued upon payment of the 93 proper license tax amount and fees and is valid for not more 94 than 12 months. For each extended registration period occurring 95 after the one in which the metal registration license plate is 96 issued and until the license plate is required to be replaced, 97 the renewal shall be recorded electronically a validation 98 sticker showing the year of expiration shall be issued upon 99 payment of the proper license tax amount and fees and is valid 100 for not more than 24 months. For each permanent registration 101 period occurring after the one in which the metal registration 102 license plate is issued and until the license plate is required 103 to be replaced, the renewal shall be recorded electronically a 104 validation sticker showing a permanent registration period shall 105 be issued upon payment of the proper license tax amount and fees 106 and is permanently valid but shall become void if the proper 107 license taxes and fees are not paid annually. When license 108 plates equipped with validation stickers are issued in any month 109 other than the ownerâs birth month or the designated 110 registration period for any other motor vehicle, the effective 111 date shall reflect the birth month or month and the year of 112 renewal. However, when a license plate or validation sticker is 113 issued for a period of less than 12 months, the applicant shall 114 pay the appropriate amount of license tax and the applicable fee 115 under s. 320.14 in addition to all other fees. Validation 116 stickers issued for vehicles taxed under s. 320.08(6)(a), for 117 any company that owns 250 vehicles or more, or for semitrailers 118 taxed under the provisions of s. 320.08(5)(a), for any company 119 that owns 50 vehicles or more, may be placed on any vehicle in 120 the fleet so long as the vehicle receiving the validation 121 sticker has the same ownerâs name and address as the vehicle to 122 which the validation sticker was originally assigned. 123 (2)âThe department shall provide the several tax collectors 124 and license plate agents with the necessary number of validation 125 stickers. 126 (2)(3)(a)âRegistration license plates must be made of metal 127 specially treated with a retroreflection material, as specified 128 by the department. The registration license plate is designed to 129 increase nighttime visibility and legibility and must be at 130 least 6 inches wide and not less than 12 inches in length, 131 unless a plate with reduced dimensions is deemed necessary by 132 the department to accommodate motorcycles, mopeds, similar 133 smaller vehicles, or trailers. Validation stickers must also be 134 treated with a retroreflection material, must be of such size as 135 specified by the department, and must adhere to the license 136 plate. The registration license plate must be imprinted with a 137 combination of bold letters and numerals or numerals, not to 138 exceed seven digits, to identify the registration license plate 139 number. The license plate must be imprinted with the word 140 âFloridaâ at the top and the name of the county in which it is 141 sold, the state motto, or the words âSunshine Stateâ at the 142 bottom. Apportioned license plates must have the word 143 âApportionedâ at the bottom, and license plates issued for 144 vehicles taxed under s. 320.08(3)(d), (4)(m) or (n), (5)(b) or 145 (c), or (14) must have the word âRestrictedâ at the bottom. 146 License plates issued for vehicles taxed under s. 320.08(12) 147 must be imprinted with the word âFloridaâ at the top and the 148 word âDealerâ at the bottom unless the license plate is a 149 specialty license plate as authorized in s. 320.08056. 150 Manufacturer license plates issued for vehicles taxed under s. 151 320.08(12) must be imprinted with the word âFloridaâ at the top 152 and the word âManufacturerâ at the bottom. License plates issued 153 for vehicles taxed under s. 320.08(5)(d) or (e) must be 154 imprinted with the word âWreckerâ at the bottom. Any county may, 155 upon majority vote of the county commission, elect to have the 156 county name removed from the license plates sold in that county. 157 The state motto or the words âSunshine Stateâ shall be printed 158 in lieu thereof. A license plate issued for a vehicle taxed 159 under s. 320.08(6) may not be assigned a registration license 160 number, or be issued with any other distinctive character or 161 designation, that distinguishes the motor vehicle as a for-hire 162 motor vehicle. 163 (b)âAn additional fee of 50 cents shall be collected on 164 each motor vehicle registration or motor vehicle renewal 165 registration issued in this state in order for all license 166 plates and validation stickers to be fully treated with 167 retroreflection material. The fee shall be deposited into the 168 Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund. 169 (3)(4)âThe corporation organized under chapter 946 may 170 manufacture license plates, validation stickers, and decals, as 171 well as temporary tags, disabled hang tags, vessel decals, and 172 fuel use decals, for the Department of Highway Safety and Motor 173 Vehicles as provided in this chapter and chapter 327. The 174 Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles is not required 175 to obtain competitive bids in order to contract with the 176 corporation. 177 (4)(5)âThe department may conduct a pilot program to 178 evaluate the designs, concepts, and technologies for alternative 179 license plates. For purposes of the pilot program, the 180 department shall investigate the feasibility and use of 181 alternative license plate technologies and the long-term cost 182 impact to the consumer. The pilot program shall be limited to 183 license plates that are used on government-owned motor vehicles 184 as described in s. 320.0655. Such license plates are exempt from 185 the requirements in paragraph (2)(a) (3)(a). 186 (5)(6)âAll license plates issued pursuant to this chapter 187 are the property of the state. 188 Section 2.âSection 320.08035, Florida Statutes, is amended 189 to read: 190 320.08035âPersons who have disabilities; reduced dimension 191 license plate.âThe owner or lessee of a motorcycle, moped, or 192 motorized disability access vehicle who resides in this state 193 and qualifies for a parking permit for a person who has a 194 disability under s. 320.0848, upon application and payment of 195 the appropriate license tax and fees under s. 320.08(1), must be 196 issued a license plate that has reduced dimensions as provided 197 under s. 320.06(2)(a) s. 320.06(3)(a). The plate must be stamped 198 with the international symbol of accessibility after the numeric 199 and alpha serial number of the license plate. The plate entitles 200 the person to all privileges afforded by a disabled parking 201 permit issued under s. 320.0848. 202 Section 3.âSubsection (4) of section 320.0807, Florida 203 Statutes, is amended to read: 204 320.0807âSpecial license plates for Governor and federal 205 and state legislators.â 206 (4)âLicense plates purchased under subsection (1), 207 subsection (2), or subsection (3) shall be replaced by the 208 department at no cost, other than the fees required under ss. 209 320.04 and 320.06(2)(b) ss. 320.04 and 320.06(3)(b), when the 210 person to whom the plates have been issued leaves the elective 211 office with respect to which the license plates were issued. 212 Within 30 days after leaving office, the person to whom the 213 license plates have been issued must apply to the department for 214 a replacement license plate. The person may return the prestige 215 license plates to the department or retain the plates as 216 souvenirs. Upon receipt of the replacement license plate, the 217 person may not display on any vehicle the prestige license plate 218 or plates issued with respect to his or her former office. 219 Section 4.âParagraph (b) of subsection (4) of section 220 320.084, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 221 320.084âFree motor vehicle license plate to certain 222 disabled veterans.â 223 (4) 224 (b)âThere shall be a service charge in accordance with the 225 provisions of s. 320.04 for each initial application or renewal 226 of registration and an additional sum of 50 cents on each 227 license plate and validation sticker as provided in s. 228 320.06(2)(b) s. 320.06(3)(b). 229 Section 5.âSection 320.102, Florida Statutes, is amended to 230 read: 231 320.102âMarine boat trailers owned by nonprofit 232 organizations; exemptions.âThe registration or renewal of a 233 registration of any marine boat trailer owned and operated by a 234 nonprofit organization that is exempt from federal income tax 235 under s. 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and which is 236 used exclusively in carrying out its customary nonprofit 237 activities is exempt from paying the fees, taxes, surcharges, 238 and charges in ss. 320.03(5), (6), and (9), 320.031(2), 239 320.04(1), 320.06(1)(b) and (2)(b) (3)(b), 320.0801, 320.0802, 240 320.0804, and 320.08046. 241 Section 6.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.